California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) (1) To the degree child care and development services administered by the State Department of Education pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of the Education Code are used to serve families receiving aid to families with dependent children that are eligible for child care under the AFDC program, the department and the State Department of Education, in consultation with the county welfare departments, shall establish a system for documenting child care usage by this population so the state can claim the maximum amount to which it is entitled under Title IV-A of the Social Security Act, contained in Part A (commencing with Section 601) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department and the State Department of Education shall coordinate their efforts and claim federal financial participation pursuant to Title IV-A of the Social Security Act.

(3) Upon the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the department, and the State Department of Education shall enter into an interagency agreement to transfer Title IV-A funds from the department to the State Department of Education and to ensure that all federal requirements are met in carrying out the program made possible by the receipt of Title IV-A funds. 

(4) The system established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be implemented only to the extent that its implementation does not result in an overall increase in expenditures from the General Fund.

(b) (1) Title IV-A funds received pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be used to expand child care and development services in accordance with the interagency agreement required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). 

(2) In no case shall Title IV-A funds received pursuant to this section be used to supplant existing state funds and cause the state to violate the maintenance of effort requirements for the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant and the Title IV-A “at-risk” programs. Funds made available pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be expended by the departments to support the following:

(A) Any additional administrative costs associated with documenting and claiming federal reimbursement incurred by the department, the State Department of Education, county welfare offices, and child care and development services contractors. 

(B) Expanded child care and development services to families receiving AFDC benefits, in the following order of priority:

(i) AFDC families in approved education and training programs, except those receiving services under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2.

(ii) AFDC applicants or recipients who choose the Alternative Assistance Program pursuant to Section 11280.

(iii) All other AFDC recipients who meet the eligibility criteria for federally funded Title IV-A child care pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 8278 of the Education Code and Item 6110-196-001 of the Budget Act of 1991 (Chapter 118 of the Statutes of 1991), the Superintendent of Public Instruction may authorize the expenditure of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in child care carryover funds by the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services, through an interagency agreement, for the purposes of implementing the program specified in this section in the 1991–92 and 1992–93 fiscal years.

(2) Prior to making the authorization under paragraph (1), the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature of the amounts to be expended pursuant to this subdivision. 

(3) Funds that may be expended pursuant to this subdivision shall be expended for the purpose of supporting administrative costs associated with claiming federal reimbursement for families with dependent children receiving services pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of the Education Code. In the 1993–94 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years, state administrative funds for both departments shall be appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) For purposes of this section, “Title IV-A funds” means federal money received pursuant to Part A (commencing with Section 601) of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 230.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.20.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any amount, including any interest or property, received by a holocaust victim, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 17155 of the Revenue and Taxation Code either as compensation pursuant to the German Act Regulating Unresolved Property Claims, as amended (Gesetz zur Regelung offener Vermogensfragen), or as a result of a settlement of claims against any entity or individual for any recovered asset, shall not be considered as income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility to receive Medi-Cal benefits or public assistance benefits or the amounts of those benefits.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, excludable restitution payments, as defined in Section 17131.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall not be included in income or resources of any individual who is eligible for the exclusion under Section 17131.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for purposes of determining eligibility for any aid, grant, or benefit under this division.

(c) This section shall not be construed to permit any retroactive services or payments to be provided to recipients of Medi-Cal or public assistance benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 701, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11009.1.

The value of free board and lodging supplied to a recipient during a temporary absence from his home of not more than one month, shall be considered an inconsequential resource and shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient is otherwise entitled.

After an absence of one month, free board and lodging shall be considered income to the extent the value exceeds the continuing cost to the recipient of maintaining the home to which he expects to return.

This section shall not apply to recipients under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11010.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 12152 in determining the amount of aid grants payable under a public assistance program, no consideration shall be given to voluntary contributions or grants from other public sources, private agencies, friends or relatives when such contributions or grants meet the following conditions:

1. The service to be provided is designated by the department and is not covered by an assistance allowance under the particular program, and

2. The contribution or grant would not be available for expenditure by or in behalf of the recipient unless it is used in accordance with the conditions imposed by the donor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11010.5.

General unrestricted or undesignated private charitable donations and contributions made to charitable or nonprofit organizations shall not be deducted from the cost of providing services under this division or Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 290.)
-------------------------------------------

11011.

(a) (1) (A) The Safety Net Reserve Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. The Medi-Cal Subaccount and the CalWORKs Subaccount are hereby created within the Safety Net Reserve Fund.

(B) On and after the effective date of the act adding this subparagraph, the Medi-Cal Subaccount and the CalWORKs Subaccount established pursuant to subparagraph (A) are hereby abolished and the balances remaining in those subaccounts shall be transferred to the Safety Net Reserve Fund.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the funds in the Safety Net Reserve Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the
 Government Code.

(b) Upon the enactment of the 2018 Budget Act, upon order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) from the General Fund to the CalWORKs Subaccount.

(c) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Safety Net Reserve Fund shall be utilized, in addition to other state revenues, for the purpose of maintaining existing program benefits and services for the Medi-Cal and CalWORKs programs during economic downturns, when program costs may increase due to economic conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 143.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11011.1.

For the 2018–19 fiscal year, upon order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer seven hundred million dollars ($700,000,000) from the General Fund to the Safety Net Reserve Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 144.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11011.2.

For the 2021–22 fiscal year, upon order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer four hundred fifty million dollars ($450,000,000) from the General Fund to the Safety Net Reserve Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 29.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.

(a) The department may require issuance of an identification card to recipients of aid.

The identification card shall contain the following information:

(1) Name and address of the recipient.

(2) Social security number.

(3) Color photograph and identifying characteristics.

(b) The department shall determine the need for including additional information and instructions on the identification card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212.)
-------------------------------------------

11014.

To the extent that any provision of this part prohibits the granting of aid to persons confined in a public institution for tuberculosis or mental disease or as a result of the diagnosis of tuberculosis, intellectual disability, or psychosis permitted by federal law, that provision shall be inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 67.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11015.

Unless there are other grounds therefor, aid grants shall not be withheld pending ascertainment of increases in federal benefits or increases in benefits payable by a public agency.

Following the ascertainment of any such increase, adjustment shall be made, as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 11004, for any overpayment of aid which the recipient might have received.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11014 (as added by Stats. 1965(2x), Ch. 12) by Stats. 1967, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

11016.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person for whom federal financial participation is available shall be denied benefits, for which federal financial participation is available, solely because such person is incarcerated in a county or city jail or juvenile detention facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 90, Sec. 4.   Effective May 9, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

11017.

In computing and paying assistance under this part, the need and income amounts used shall be rounded to the next lower whole dollar when the result of determining the standard of need or the payment amount includes an amount which is not a whole dollar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11017.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 11017, the State Department of Social Services, at the next computation of annual cost-of-living adjustments for public assistance payments on and after August 28, 1969, under Part 3 (commencing with Section 11000) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall make all such adjustments to the nearer fifty cents ($0.50) in order that all future grant computations and payments may be made to the nearer dollar. Thereafter subsequent cost-of-living adjustments shall be made to the nearer dollar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

11020.

(a) Where a recipient under a categorical aid program other than CalWORKs has received aid in good faith but in fact owned excess property, he or she shall be considered to have been ineligible for aid during the period for which any excess property would have supported him or her at the rate of the aid granted to him or her. Under these circumstances, the recipient or his or her estate shall repay the aid he or she received during this period of ineligibility.

(b) With respect to recipients under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of this part, overpayments shall be collected by the federal government pursuant to federal law.

(c) Where a CalWORKs recipient has received aid in good faith, but in fact owned excess property, the recipient shall have an overpayment equal to the lesser of the amount of the excess property or the aid received during the period the recipient owned the excess property and the grant was not accurately determined under the semiannual reporting, prospective budgeting system due to the excess property.

(d) (1) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2013. A county shall implement the semiannual reporting requirements in accordance with the act that added this section no later than October 1, 2013.

(2) Upon implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.

(3) Upon filing the certificate described in paragraph (2), a county shall comply with the semiannual reporting provisions of this section.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 501, Sec. 5.   (AB 6)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative April 1, 2013, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11021.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no individual who is an applicant for, or recipient of, aid or assistance under a state plan approved under Title IV, X, XIV, XVI, or XIX of the federal Social Security Act; assistance funded by payments under Title V or XX of the federal Social Security Act; or of benefits under the Supplemental Security Income program established by Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act shall:

(a) Be required as a condition of eligibility for or of continuing to receive that aid, assistance, or benefit, to make an election to receive funds according to Section 10113.1 of the Insurance Code, or to receive funds under an accelerated death benefit under a policy of life insurance. 

(b) By reason of failure to make such an election, be denied or suffer a reduction in the amount of aid, assistance, or benefits, unless that individual would thereby exceed federal eligibility limits under Title IV, X, XIV, XVI, or XIX of the federal Social Security Act, assistance funded by payments under Title V or XX of the federal Social Security Act, or of benefits under the Supplemental Security Income program established by Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act. 

For purposes of this section, “accelerated death benefit” means any payment made by the life insurer under the terms of a life insurance policy while the insured individual is alive as a result of a recalculation of the insured individual’s life expectancy by the life insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 475, Sec. 3.   Effective October 2, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11022.

The State Department of Health Services and the State Department of Social Services shall prepare information on the effect of funds received according to Sections 10113.1 and 10113.2 of the Insurance Code as to eligibility to receive or to continue to receive aid, assistance, or benefits from all federal, state, or other relevant assistance programs. All information shall be prepared for distribution to benefit counselors and viatical settlements corporations to be distributed at the time of solicitation by viatical settlements corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 796, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11023.

(a) If a county human services agency elects to use information contained in a consumer credit report for the determination of CalFresh or CalWORKs eligibility or benefit level, the county shall obtain written authorization from an applicant or recipient prior to obtaining the credit report.

(b) If a county takes an adverse action against an applicant or recipient, the determination of which was based, in whole or in part, upon information contained in the consumer credit report, the county shall do all of the following:

 (1) Provide the applicant or recipient with the notice required by Section 615 of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act
 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681m), indicating that the verification or eligibility determination was based, in whole or in part, upon the information contained in the consumer credit report.

(2) Issue the notice required by paragraph (1) in writing and in accordance with the standards for adequate notice established in federal law.

(3) Make the information available to an applicant or recipient who requests a copy of his or her case file or appeals a negative action based in whole or in part on information the county obtained from the consumer credit report.

(c) For purposes of this section, an “adverse action” means a determination of ineligibility for CalFresh or CalWORKs or a reduction in benefits or services.

(d) The written authorization and notice required
 by this section may be provided by electronic means.

(e) If the county human services agency elects to use information contained in a consumer credit report for the determination of benefit level, the county shall not require the applicant or recipient to submit hard-copy documentation that is duplicative of the information it will verify using the credit report.

(f) Nothing in this section precludes the use of other forms of verification or prohibits the county from requesting additional documentation when the county establishes, in writing, that the information it has already received is questionable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 308, Sec. 2.   (SB 1232)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11023.5.

(a) Any applicant or recipient of benefits under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children, CalFresh, and Medi-Cal programs, who delivers a document which has been requested by the county welfare department shall, upon the applicant’s or recipient’s request, be provided with a written receipt indicating that the county welfare department has received the document. A notice which explains an applicant’s and recipient’s right to receipts upon request shall be prominently posted by the county welfare department at the location where the document is to be delivered. The receipt shall be issued at the time the document is delivered.

(1) A county which maintains a system of logging
 hand delivered documents is exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.

(2) County welfare departments which provide receipts for all hand delivered documents without a request by an applicant or recipient shall be exempt from the notice posting requirement.

(b) The county welfare department shall only provide receipts for documents which have been delivered in person to a county welfare department employee other than the applicant’s or recipient’s regularly assigned caseworker and to the location in which or through which the caseworker conducts his or her business. Only one receipt is required for monthly income reports and their supporting documents which are hand delivered. Monthly income reports and other requested documents which have been mailed shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.

(c) In consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association and the Coalition of California Welfare Rights Organizations, the department shall develop the notice which informs applicants and recipients of the right to receipts for hand delivered documents and shall develop minimum guidelines for county receipt forms.

(d) As used in this section, “applicant or recipient” means an applicant or recipient of benefits under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children, CalFresh, and Medi-Cal programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 39.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11023.7.

(a) If it is within the capacity of the county, a county may communicate with an applicant for, or recipient of, benefits under CalWORKs (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200)), CalFresh (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6), or the Cash Assistance Program for Aged, Blind, and Disabled Legal Immigrants (Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6)
 via computer-generated text message. All communications and notices of actions sent via computer-generated text message shall comply with Section 227 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(b) Communications sent via computer-generated text message shall not include case-identifying information, as that term is defined by the State Department of Social Services. Notices of action may only be sent via computer-generated text message pursuant to this section using a link to a secure online portal where the applicant or recipient can access the notice of action after securely logging in. All other communications sent via computer-generated text messages to an applicant or recipient are not required to be sent using a link to a secure online portal unless otherwise required by federal law or guidance.

(c) Only the first or last name, but not both, of an applicant or recipient may appear in
 a text message generated pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) All electronic technology used pursuant to this section shall be in compliance with state information technology policy, and related state and federal law, including, but not limited to, Sections 7405 and 11135 of the Government Code, Section 508 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794d), as amended, and the regulations implementing that act, as set forth in Part 1194 (commencing with Section 1194.1) of Chapter XI of Title 36 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Appendices A, C, and D of that part, and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), and the obligation under these laws to communicate with people with disabilities in a manner that is as effective as communications
 with people without disabilities.

(2) This subdivision is declarative of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   (AB 1957)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Program Data [11024. - 11024.3.]

11024.

(a) Commencing March 1, 2002, the State Department of Health Services shall, monthly, post on the Internet Web site maintained by the State Department of Health Services 10 tables on the number of persons enrolled in the Medi-Cal program. These tables shall include one table on the number of children enrolled in all categories of the Medi-Cal program, by ethnicity, gender, and age, to the extent that data is collected, for 12 months of data. The tables shall provide different breakdowns of the Medi-Cal population by the various aid code categories. Some of the tables shall differentiate between the family-based Medi-Cal programs where eligibility is conditioned upon the presence of a child or pregnant woman, and nonfamily-based Medi-Cal programs where eligibility is conditioned by the presence of aged, blind, or disabled persons. Some of the tables shall provide enrollment levels for the family-based programs differentiating between beneficiaries in cash-related Medi-Cal programs and beneficiaries in noncash-related Medi-Cal programs. Some of the tables shall also include 12 months of data.

(b) The State Department of Health Services shall display on its Web site the information required by subdivision (a) by both statewide totals and county-by-county breakdowns, and shall show the percentage increase or decrease in each county by month and by year.

(c) The information posted on the Web site maintained by the State Department of Health Services pursuant to this section shall be posted in a format that is simple, not technical, does not require downloading, and is likely to be easily understood by the general public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11024.3.

Commencing March 1, 2002, the State Department of Health Services shall post all of the following data on its Internet Web site and in a format that may be easily understood by the general public, in addition to the information required by Section 11024:

(a) All county letters and county information notices prepared after January 1, 2002.

(b) All application forms for the following programs, to the extent they are available in computerized form:

(1) The Medi-Cal program.

(2) The California Children’s Services Program.

(3) The Child Health and Disability Prevention Program.

(4) The Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment (Family PACT) Waiver Program under subdivision (aa) of Section 14132.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Access to Franchise Tax Board Information [11025. - 11026.5.]

11025.

(a) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Services shall utilize the records of the Franchise Tax Board to match unearned income against reported income of applicants for and recipients of aid or public social services under this division. The matching information shall then be forwarded to the appropriate county welfare department for use in determining the eligibility of, and proper grant amount for, applicants for, and recipients of, aid or public social services under this division. Any and all documents and records that result from the matching of records with the Franchise Tax Board shall be subject to the confidentiality requirements of Section 10850.

(b) This section shall not be construed to supersede the requirements and protections in the California Right to Financial Privacy Act under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code in obtaining information in possession of any financial institution.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent it is funded in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 377.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11026.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall annually inform the Franchise Tax Board of the names and social security numbers of all applicants or recipients of public social services or public assistance programs. The Franchise Tax Board, upon receipt of that information, shall furnish to the departments the information required by Section 19555 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) This section shall be implemented only to the extent it is funded in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 2.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11026.5.

(a) To the extent not prohibited by federal law, the State Department of Health Care Services shall annually inform the Employment Development Department of the names and social security numbers of all recipients of the benefits of the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000)).

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall determine the average per individual cost
 of state and federally funded benefits provided by the
 Medi-Cal program excluding administrative costs of the Medi-Cal program. These departments shall then inform the Employment Development Department of these costs in order for the Employment Development Department to calculate the information that is required to be reported pursuant to Section 13084 of the Government Code.

(c) The State Department of Social Services shall, based on the most recent data available to the department, annually determine and provide the following information to the Employment Development Department, to the extent not
 prohibited by state and federal confidentiality statutes and regulations, in order for the Employment Development Department to provide data needed by the Department of Finance to compile the report required by Section 13084 of the Government Code:

(1) The percentage of individuals who are recipients of the Medi-Cal Program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000)) who are also recipients of the CalFresh program (Chapter 10, commencing with Section 18900 of Part 6).

(2) The average individual CalFresh benefit for individuals who are members of households in which at least one member is employed.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2020, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 889, Sec. 4.   (AB 1792)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Applications [11050. - 11063.]

11050.

Except as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of this part and Section 11403 of this code, applications for public social services or public assistance by any person, or in behalf of any person, shall be made to the county department in the county in which the applicant is living. The application may be made in writing or reduced to writing upon the standard form prescribed in regulations of the department and a copy shall be furnished to each applicant at the time of the application.

The state is responsible for maintaining uniformity in the public social service programs provided for in Part 3 (commencing with Section 11000) of this division, and in order to promote and insure such uniformity, the department shall be responsible for the control of administering the payment of grants for all aid programs.

The department may contract with any county for the performance of eligibility and grant determinations for applicants or recipients within the jurisdiction of the contracting county, or for applicants or recipients within the jurisdiction of another county which has not contracted with the department to perform such functions or whose contract with the department has been terminated or in the absence of such contract the department may act in the place of the county and assume direct responsibility for the administration of such eligibility and grant determinations.

The department shall have the right to terminate any such contract immediately if the contracting county fails to carry out its contractual obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

11051.

The department shall include questions that enable an applicant to disclose a disability, the need for accommodation due to disability, and any experience of domestic violence, in any amendment or revision adopted on or after January 1, 2019, to the standard form for initial applications described in Section 11050.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 2030)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11052.

Application for aid may be made within 60 days prior to the date on which the applicant meets the technical requirements for such aid which have to do with factors other than need.

Application made on behalf of a child deprived of parental support because of separation or desertion may be made within 60 days prior to the date on which he will become eligible.

The application shall be promptly investigated and acted upon, but in no event shall the aid, if granted, begin as of a date prior to the date on which he meets such requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11052.1.

The department shall undertake activities designed to facilitate the dissemination of information to applicants for, and recipients of, aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) regarding work incentive provisions in existing law, in order to ensure that clients are aware of these provisions and their effect. These activities shall include all of the following:

(a) Developing state materials to accomplish this purpose and distributing the materials to county welfare departments for dissemination to clients as part of the regular intake and redetermination process.

(b) Modifying the current rights and responsibilities portion of the application process to include positive information about work.

(c) Developing other options to facilitate county administrative activities designed to encourage AFDC clients to work, such as including in the regular intake and redetermination process an oral or video presentation regarding work incentives, and using specialized staff, such as Greater Avenues for Independence Program (GAIN) employment counselors, to provide work-related counseling and information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 307, Sec. 4.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11052.5.

(a) An applicant shall not be granted public assistance under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) and Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 13000) until he or she is first personally interviewed by the office of the county human services agency or state staff for patients in state hospitals. 

(b) (1) In determining eligibility for public assistance under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), in lieu of an in-person personal interview as required under subdivision (a), the county may elect to conduct the interview required by this
 section telephonically or through other electronic means.

(2) A county that elects to conduct the interview telephonically or through other electronic means shall include a set of procedures in its county plan for conducting interviews in that manner that ensure that clients whose interviews are conducted telephonically or through other electronic means are provided with the same information that is provided to individuals who have their interviews conducted in person.

(c) If an applicant is incapable of acting on his or her own behalf, the county department
 shall verify this fact by personal contact with the applicant before aid is authorized.

(d) The interview conducted pursuant to this section shall occur within seven days after the time of application unless there are extenuating circumstances that justify further delay.

(e) If a county elects to conduct the personal interview to determine eligibility for public assistance under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) required under subdivision (a) telephonically or through other electronic means, pursuant to subdivision (b), the county shall conduct an in-person personal interview in lieu of an interview through telephonic or other electronic means if requested by an applicant.

(f) For purposes of this section, “public assistance” does not include health care as provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 798, Sec. 2.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11054.

(a) (1) Each applicant shall be required before approval of assistance or services to file an affirmation setting forth the applicant’s belief that
 the applicant meets the specific conditions of eligibility. Such statements shall be on forms prescribed by the department and, in the case of applicants for aid to families with dependent children, shall contain a written declaration that the affirmation is made under penalty of perjury. Any person signing a statement containing such declaration, who willfully and knowingly with intent to deceive states as true any material matter that the person knows to be false, is subject to the penalty prescribed for perjury in the Penal Code.

(2) Whenever the applicant is incapable of completing the affirmation required pursuant to paragraph (1), and a guardian or conservator of the applicant’s estate has not been appointed, the affirmation may be completed on
 the applicant’s behalf by a relative or close personal friend or a representative of a public agency who has all necessary knowledge regarding the applicant’s circumstances and is willing to affirm thereto. A copy of the affirmation shall be furnished to the applicant or other person completing it at the time it is filed. The other person completing an affirmation who willfully and knowingly with intent to deceive states as true any material matter that the person knows to be false is subject to the penalty prescribed for perjury in the Penal Code.

(3) A county department may also require like statements to be completed before approving restoration of aid as provided by Section 11051, and may require new statements at any time for purposes of continuing assistance.

(b) On and after July 1, 2021, an applicant may complete the affirmation described in subdivision (a) by means of an oral attestation in lieu of a written declaration if the applicant is unable to provide a physical signature or the county human services agency is unable to accept
 an electronic signature. Except for benefits issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450, the applicant shall submit a physical signature within 30 working days following an oral attestation for benefits to continue.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall remain operative until the California Statewide Automated Welfare System consortium has implemented an integrated telephonic signature solution. Upon implementation of a telephonic signature solution, the affirmation described in subdivision (a) may be satisfied by use of a telephonic signature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 30.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11055.

The county shall promptly investigate all applications for public assistance as prescribed by the regulations of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11055.5.

(a) In the administration of the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program, counties may conduct an early fraud prevention and detection program pursuant to this section. 

(b) Funding for an early fraud prevention and detection program pursuant to Section 15204.6 shall not be made to a county if the department determines that an early fraud prevention and detection program would not be cost-effective in that county. 

(c) Funding for an early fraud prevention and detection program pursuant to Section 15204.6 shall not be available to a county until its operating plan for a program is approved by the department. No operating plan shall be approved by the department unless the plan contains assurances that the county will comply with the conditions specified in subdivision (d). 
